Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2630
Insurance consultant; contract or agreement; conditions.

No contract or agreement with an insurance consultant shall be enforceable by such consultant unless it is in writing and executed in duplicate by the person to be charged or by the authorized representative of such person. The agreement shall define the subject matter of the consulting services, outline the nature of the work to be performed by the consultant, and state the fee for the work. The consultant shall retain a copy of the agreement for not less than five years after completion of the services.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 25;

Laws 1981, LB 57, § 1.